Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Certified Public Accountants.

Sec. 08.04.100.
Certificate granted.

The certificate of “Certified Public Accountant” shall be granted by the board to any person who meets the requirements of AS

08.04.110

—

08.04.130

. The holder of a certificate issued under this section is not authorized to engage in the practice of public accounting in the state unless the holder also has a current license or permit, or an out-of-state exemption or practice privilege.

History.

(§ 3(1) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 8 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 5 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, deleted “, or an out-of-state exemption or practice privilege” at the end.

Sec. 08.04.100.
Certificate granted.

The certificate of “Certified Public Accountant” shall be granted by the board to any person who meets the requirements of AS

08.04.110

—

08.04.130

. The holder of a certificate issued under this section is not authorized to engage in the practice of public accounting in the state unless the holder also has a current license or permit.

History.

(§ 3(1) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 8 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 5 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 2 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.105.
License for individual to practice as a public accountant.

The board shall issue a license to engage in the practice of public accounting to an individual who meets the requirements of AS

08.04.110

—

08.04.130

. The license is valid for the remainder of the biennial licensing period during which the initial license was granted.

The board may renew a license granted under this section if the licensee

maintains all of the licensee’s offices as required by AS

08.04.360

—

08.04.380

;

complies with the continuing education requirements of AS

08.04.425

and the quality review requirements of AS

08.04.426

; and

complies with the requirements of this chapter.

History.

(§ 9 ch 16 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For requirements for certificate or license, see 12 AAC 4, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, in (b)(1), substituted “AS

08.04.360

and

08.04.370

” for “AS

08.04.360

–

08.04.380

”; in (b)(2), substituted “peer review requirements” for “quality review requirements”.

Sec. 08.04.105.
License for individual to practice as a public accountant.

The board shall issue a license to engage in the practice of public accounting to an individual who meets the requirements of AS

08.04.110

—

08.04.130

. The license is valid for the remainder of the biennial licensing period during which the initial license was granted.

The board may renew a license granted under this section if the licensee

maintains all of the licensee’s offices as required by AS

08.04.360

and

08.04.370

;

complies with the continuing education requirements of AS

08.04.425

and the peer review requirements of AS

08.04.426

; and

complies with the requirements of this chapter.

History.

(§ 9 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 3 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.110.
Personal requirements.

An applicant for a certified public accountant license shall be of good moral character.

History.

(§ 3(2) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 127 SLA 1974; am § 2 ch 67 SLA 1983; am § 10 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 2 ch 74 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For requirements for license, see 12 AAC 4, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 31, 2018, deleted “at least 19 years of age and” following “certified public accountant license shall be”.

Sec. 08.04.120.
Educational and experience requirements.

The education and experience requirements for an applicant are a baccalaureate degree or its equivalent conferred by a college or university acceptable to the board and additional semester hours or post-baccalaureate study so that the total educational program includes at least 150 hours, with an accounting concentration or equivalent as determined by the board by regulation to be appropriate, and two years of accounting experience satisfactory to the board.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 74 SLA 2018.]

History.

(§ 3(3) — (6) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 14 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 4 ch 21 SLA 1991; am §§ 5, 6 ch 62 SLA 1991; am §§ 22, 23 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 11 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 2008; am § 9 ch 74 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For requirements for certificate or license, see 12 AAC 4, art. 3.

For certificates and licenses, see 12 AAC 4, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 31, 2018, repealed (b).

Sec. 08.04.130.
Examination.

An applicant shall pass an examination in accounting and reporting, in auditing, and in other related subjects that the board determines appropriate. The examination shall be designated in advance by the board as the examination for the license of certified public accountant. The board shall use the Uniform Certified Public Accountant Examination of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and the institute’s advisory grading service, if available. The board shall, by regulation, establish what constitutes a passing grade on the examination for purposes of licensure under AS

08.04.105

—

08.04.240

.

History.

(§ 3(7) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 7 ch 62 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 139 SLA 2003; am § 12 ch 16 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For requirements for certificate or license, see 12 AAC 4, art. 3.

For examination, see 12 AAC 4, art. 4.

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 4, art. 7.

Sec. 08.04.140.
Frequency of examination [Repealed by § 3, ch. 139, SLA 2003.]

Sec. 08.04.150.
Qualifications to take examination.

A person is qualified to take the examination for certified public accountants if the person either

has a baccalaureate degree or its equivalent conferred by a college or university acceptable to the board with

an accounting concentration or the equivalent, as defined in regulations of the board;

a minimum of 15 semester credit hours or 22 quarter credit hours of accounting subjects; or

one year of public accounting experience under the direct supervision of a certified public accountant; or

has met or is within 18 semester credit hours or 27 quarter credit hours of meeting the undergraduate educational requirements of AS

08.04.120

and has completed at least 15 semester hours or 22 quarter hours of accounting subjects.

History.

(§ 3(9) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 8 ch 62 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For requirements for certificate or license, see 12 AAC 4, art. 3.

For examination, see 12 AAC 4, art. 4.

Sec. 08.04.160.
Re-examination. [Repealed by § 3, ch. 139, SLA 2003.]

Sec. 08.04.170.
Examination standards. [Repealed by § 3, ch. 139, SLA 2003.]

Sec. 08.04.180.
Prior applicants.

History.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 74 SLA 2018.]

Sec. 08.04.190.
Examination fee.

An applicant shall pay the appropriate fee at the time of application for examination or reexamination.

History.

(§ 3(12) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 147 SLA 1976; am § 4 ch 37 SLA 1985)

Sec. 08.04.195.
Reciprocity with other states.

Notwithstanding AS

08.04.110

—

08.04.190

, the board may issue a license to engage in the practice of public accounting to an applicant who holds a license, or its equivalent, issued by another state if the applicant

passed the Uniform Certified Public Accountant Examination of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants in order to receive the applicant’s initial license from the other state;

meets the accounting experience requirements established by the board by regulation;

is not the subject of review procedures, disciplinary proceedings, or unresolved complaints related to the applicant’s license from another state; and

is of good moral character.

An applicant for the initial issuance of a license under this section shall list in the application all states where the applicant has applied for or holds a license, or its equivalent, and shall notify the board in writing within 30 days after a denial, revocation, or suspension of a license, or the equivalent, by another state.

The board may by regulation establish the education and continuing education requirements for the issuance of a license under this section.

The board may renew a license issued under this section if the licensee

maintains all of the licensee’s offices as required by AS

08.04.360

—

08.04.380

;

complies with the continuing education requirements established under (c) of this section; and

complies with the requirements of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 139 SLA 2003; am §§ 14, 15 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 3 ch 74 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For temporary courtesy licenses, see AS

08.01.062

.

Administrative Code. —

For requirements for certificate or license, see 12 AAC 4, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 31, 2018, rewrote (a)(2), which read “has four years of experience outside the state in the practice of public accounting or meets equivalent requirements established by the board by regulation; the four years must occur after the applicant passes the examination required in (1) of this subsection and within the 10 years immediately preceding the applicant’s application under this chapter;”.

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, in (d)(1), substituted “AS

08.04.360

and

08.04.370

” for “AS

08.04.360

—

08.04.380

”.

Sec. 08.04.195.
Reciprocity with other states.

Notwithstanding AS

08.04.110

—

08.04.190

, the board may issue a license to engage in the practice of public accounting to an applicant who holds a license, or its equivalent, issued by another state if the applicant

passed the Uniform Certified Public Accountant Examination of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants in order to receive the applicant’s initial license from the other state;

meets the accounting experience requirements established by the board by regulation;

is not the subject of review procedures, disciplinary proceedings, or unresolved complaints related to the applicant’s license from another state; and

is of good moral character.

An applicant for the initial issuance of a license under this section shall list in the application all states where the applicant has applied for or holds a license, or its equivalent, and shall notify the board in writing within 30 days after a denial, revocation, or suspension of a license, or the equivalent, by another state.

The board may by regulation establish the education and continuing education requirements for the issuance of a license under this section.

The board may renew a license issued under this section if the licensee

maintains all of the licensee’s offices as required by AS

08.04.360

and

08.04.370

;

complies with the continuing education requirements established under (c) of this section; and

complies with the requirements of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 139 SLA 2003; am §§ 14, 15 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 3 ch 74 SLA 2018; am § 4 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.200.
Use of title “certified public accountant” by individual.

An individual who has a license from the board as a certified public accountant or holds a practice privilege shall be known as a certified public accountant and may use the abbreviation “CPA.”

History.

(§ 3(13) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 16 ch 16 SLA 2006; am § 6 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Sec. 08.04.210.
Effect on certificates existing on April 26, 1960.

A person who, on April 26, 1960, held a certificate as a certified public accountant issued under the laws of the Territory or State of Alaska is not required to obtain a license under this chapter but is otherwise subject to this chapter. Certificates issued before April 26, 1960, shall be considered licenses issued under this chapter.

History.

(§ 3(14) ch 187 SLA 1960; am § 17 ch 16 SLA 2006)

Sec. 08.04.220.
Certification of foreign accountants. [Repealed, § 15 ch 82 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 08.04.230.
Registration of foreign accountants. [Repealed, § 2 ch 147 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 08.04.240.
Application of partnerships, limited liability companies, corporations, and other legal entities for permits.

The board shall grant a permit to engage in the practice of public accounting as a partnership to a partnership that applies to the board as a partnership of certified public accountants if the partnership meets the following requirements:

more than one-half of the ownership of the partnership belongs to certified public accountants of this or another state in good standing;

an individual who is a certified public accountant or has a practice privilege, who is responsible for supervising attest functions or compilation services in the partnership, and who signs or authorizes another person to sign an accountant’s report on financial statements on behalf of the partnership meets the competency requirements established by the board under AS

08.04.423

;

an individual who signs or authorizes another person to sign an accountant’s report on financial statements on behalf of the partnership meets the competency requirements established by the board under AS

08.04.423

; and

each partner who is personally engaged in this state in the practice of public accounting as a member of that partnership and whose principal place of business is in this state is a certified public accountant of this state in good standing.

The board shall grant a permit to engage in the practice of public accounting as a corporation to a corporation organized for the practice of public accounting that applies to the board as a corporation of certified public accountants if the corporation meets the following requirements:

the sole purpose and business of the corporation are to furnish to the public services not inconsistent with this chapter or the regulations adopted under it by the board; however, the corporation may invest its funds in a manner not incompatible with the practice of public accounting;

at least a simple majority of the shares of the corporation are owned by certified public accountants of this or another state in good standing and the principal officer of the corporation and any officer having authority over the practice of public accounting by the corporation is a certified public accountant of this or another state in good standing;

an individual who is a certified public accountant or has a practice privilege, who is responsible for supervising attest functions or compilation services in the corporation, and who signs or authorizes another person to sign an accountant’s report on financial statements on behalf of the corporation meets the competency requirements established by the board under AS

08.04.423

;

an individual who signs or authorizes another person to sign an accountant’s report on financial statements on behalf of the corporation meets the competency requirements established by the board under AS

08.04.423

;

each shareholder or director personally engaged in this state in the practice of public accounting and whose principal place of business is located in this state is a certified public accountant of this state in good standing;

to facilitate compliance with the provisions of this section relating to the ownership of stock, there is a written agreement binding the corporation or the qualified shareholders to purchase shares offered for sale by, or not under the ownership or effective control of, a qualified shareholder and binding a holder not a qualified shareholder to sell these shares to the corporation or the qualified shareholders; the agreement must be noticed on each certificate of corporate stock; the corporation may purchase any amount of its stock for this purpose, notwithstanding any impairment of capital, so long as one share remains outstanding; and

the corporation is in compliance with those other regulations pertaining to corporations practicing public accounting in this state that the board may adopt.

Application for a permit under this section shall be made upon the affidavit of a general partner, member, or shareholder who is a certified public accountant of this state in good standing or an individual with a practice privilege. The board shall, in each case, determine whether the applicant is eligible for a permit under this section. A partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity that is issued a permit under this section may use the words “certified public accountants” or the abbreviation “CPAs” in connection with the name of the partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity. The board shall be notified within one month after the admission or withdrawal of a partner, member, or shareholder from a partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity issued a permit under this section.

The board shall grant a permit to engage in the practice of public accounting as a limited liability company to a limited liability company engaged in this state in the practice of public accounting that applies to the board as a limited liability company of certified public accountants if

the sole purpose and the sole business of the company are to furnish to the public services that are consistent with this chapter or the regulations adopted under this chapter, except that the company may invest its money in a manner that is compatible with the practice of public accounting;

more than one-half of the ownership of the limited liability company belongs to certified public accountants of this or another state in good standing;

an individual who is a certified public accountant or has a practice privilege, who is responsible for supervising attest functions or compilation services in the company, and who signs or authorizes another person to sign an accountant’s report on financial statements on behalf of the company meets the competency requirements established by the board under AS

08.04.423

;

an individual who signs or authorizes another person to sign an accountant’s report on financial statements on behalf of the company meets the competency requirements established by the board under AS

08.04.423

; and

each member personally engaged in this state in the practice of public accounting and whose principal place of business is located in this state is a certified public accountant of this state in good standing.

The board may grant a permit to engage in the practice of public accounting to a legal entity, other than a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company, if the legal entity applies to the board on a form provided by the board and satisfies other application requirements and conditions for the legal entity that are established by the board by regulation to protect the public interest.

An initial permit issued under (a), (b), (d), or (e) of this section lasts for the remainder of the biennial licensing period during which the initial permit was granted.

The board shall renew a permit granted under (a), (b), (d), or (e) of this section or a renewal issued under this subsection if

the permittee maintains all of the licensee’s offices that are located in this state as required by AS

08.04.360

—

08.04.380

;

each individual who is required by (a), (b), (d), or (e) of this section to be a certified public accountant of this state complies with the continuing education requirements of AS

08.04.425

and the quality review requirements of AS

08.04.426

; and

the permittee complies with the requirements of this chapter, including the competency requirement of (a)(2) and (3), (b)(3) and (4), and (d)(3) and (4) of this section.

A partnership holding a permit issued under former AS 08.04.330 — 08.04.340 on June 29, 1980, qualifies for a permit under this section as long as each partner personally engaged in the practice of public accounting in this state holds a license or permit under AS

08.04.661

.

For the purposes of issuing a permit under this section, a partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity may include owners who are not certified public accountants if

the partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity designates a certified public accountant or an individual with practice privileges to be responsible for the proper registration of the entity and identifies the certified public accountant or individual to the board;

all of the owners of the partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity who are not certified public accountants are active individual participants in the partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity, or in an entity affiliated with the partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity; and

the partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity complies with the other requirements that the board may adopt by regulation to protect the public interest as described under AS

08.04.005

.

If the ownership of a partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity, after it has received or renewed a permit, does not comply with (i) of this section, the partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity shall take corrective action to comply with (i) of this section within a reasonable time after the noncompliance begins. The board shall establish by regulation the criteria to determine what is a reasonable time and may base the regulation on national standards.

History.

(§§ 5(1), 10(3) ch 187 SLA 1960; § 3 ch 147 SLA 1976; am §§ 2, 3 ch 29 SLA 1996; am §§ 18, 19 ch 16 SLA 2006; am §§ 7 — 12 ch 67 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For permits and practice privileges, see 12 AAC 4, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2022 amendment, effective September 7, 2022, in (a), in the introductory language, substituted “to a firm with an office in the state” for “as a partnership to a partnership” following “public accounting”, and substituted “firm” for “partnership” throughout, in (a)(4), substituted “owner” for “partner” at the beginning, and “the firm” for “that partnership” following “as a member”; repealed (b) — (e); in (f), substituted “or (k)” for “, (b), (d), or (e)” following “issued under”; in (g)(1), substituted “AS

08.04.360

and

08.04.370

” for “AS

08.04.360

—

08.04.380

” following “required by”, in (g)(2), substituted “or (k)” for “, (b), (d), or (e)” following “required by”, and “peer review” for “quality review” preceding “requirements”, in (g)(3), deleted “, including the competency requirement of (a)(2) and (3), (b)(3) and (4), and (d)(3) and (4) of this section;
in (i) and (j), substituted “firm” for “partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity”, or similar, throughout; added (k).

Sec. 08.04.240.
Application of partnerships, limited liability companies, corporations, and other legal entities for permits.

The board shall grant a permit to engage in the practice of public accounting to a firm with an office in the state that applies to the board as a firm of certified public accountants if the firm meets the following requirements:

more than one-half of the ownership of the firm belongs to certified public accountants of this or another state in good standing;

an individual who is a certified public accountant or has a practice privilege, who is responsible for supervising attest functions or compilation services in the firm, and who signs or authorizes another person to sign an accountant’s report on financial statements on behalf of the firm meets the competency requirements established by the board under AS

08.04.423

;

an individual who signs or authorizes another person to sign an accountant’s report on financial statements on behalf of the firm meets the competency requirements established by the board under AS

08.04.423

; and

each owner who is personally engaged in this state in the practice of public accounting as a member of the firm and whose principal place of business is in this state is a certified public accountant of this state in good standing.

[Repealed, § 44, ch 5 SLA 2022.]

[Repealed, § 44, ch 5 SLA 2022.]

[Repealed, § 44, ch 5 SLA 2022.]

[Repealed, § 44, ch 5 SLA 2022.]

An initial permit issued under (a) or (k) of this section lasts for the remainder of the biennial licensing period during which the initial permit was granted.

The board shall renew a permit granted under (a) or (k) of this section or a renewal issued under this subsection if

the permittee maintains all of the licensee’s offices that are located in this state as required by AS

08.04.360

and

08.04.370

;

each individual who is required by (a) or (k) of this section to be a certified public accountant of this state complies with the continuing education requirements of AS

08.04.425

and the peer review requirements of AS

08.04.426

; and

the permittee complies with the requirements of this chapter.

A partnership holding a permit issued under former AS 08.04.330 — 08.04.340 on June 29, 1980, qualifies for a permit under this section as long as each partner personally engaged in the practice of public accounting in this state holds a license or permit under AS

08.04.661

.

For the purposes of issuing a permit under this section, a firm may include owners who are not certified public accountants if

the firm designates a certified public accountant or an individual with practice privileges to be responsible for the proper registration of the entity and identifies the certified public accountant or individual to the board;

all of the owners of the firm who are not certified public accountants are active individual participants in the firm or in an entity affiliated with the firm; and

the firm complies with the other requirements that the board may adopt by regulation to protect the public interest as described under AS

08.04.005

.

If the ownership of a firm, after the firm has received or renewed a permit, does not comply with (i) of this section, the firm shall take corrective action to comply with (i) of this section within a reasonable time after the noncompliance begins. The board shall establish by regulation the criteria to determine what is a reasonable time and may base the regulation on national standards.

The board shall grant a permit to engage in the practice of public accounting to a firm that does not have an office in the state but provides, or offers to provide, attest functions in the state, if the firm meets the following requirements:

the firm meets the requirements of (a)(1) of this section;

the firm complies with the requirements in AS

08.04.426

;

the attest functions performed by the firm in the state are performed by an individual who is a certified public accountant of this state in good standing or who has a practice privilege; and

the firm holds a permit to engage in the practice of public accounting in good standing in the jurisdiction in which the principal office of the firm is maintained.

History.

(§§ 5(1), 10(3) ch 187 SLA 1960; § 3 ch 147 SLA 1976; am §§ 2, 3 ch 29 SLA 1996; am §§ 18, 19 ch 16 SLA 2006; am §§ 7 — 12 ch 67 SLA 2010; am § 5 ch 5 SLA 2022; am § 6 ch 5 SLA 2022; am § 7 ch 5 SLA 2022; am § 8 ch 5 SLA 2022; am § 9 ch 5 SLA 2022; am § 10 ch 5 SLA 2022; am § 44 ch 5 SLA 2022)

Sec. 08.04.250.
Requirements for registration. [Repealed, § 4 ch 147 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 08.04.260.
Temporary certificate as certified public accountant. [Repealed, § 7 ch 66 SLA 1997.]

Secs. 08.04.270 — 08.04.340.
Public accountants. [Repealed, § 15 ch 82 SLA 1980.]